Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ST. LOUIS COUNTY; HERITAGE AND ARTS CENTER.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $8,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to St. Louis County for asset preservation and expansion of the St. Louis County Heritage and Arts Center, also known as the Depot, in the city of Duluth. The project includes predesign, design, construction, and renovation work for the replacement of or improvements to mechanical, electrical, heating, ventilation, and air conditioning systems; and life-safety elements of the building. This appropriation is not available until the commissioner of management and budget determines that at least $5,671,000 has been committed from nonstate sources to complete the project. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $8,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end